Utah statutes.
20A-7-510.   Return and canvass -- Conflicting measures -- Law effective on
proclamation.
(1)  The votes on the law proposed by the initiative petition shall be
counted, canvassed, and delivered as provided in Title 20A, Chapter 4, Part 3,
Canvassing Returns.
(2)  After the local board of canvassers completes its canvass, the local
clerk shall certify to the local legislative body the vote for and against the
law proposed by the initiative petition.
(3) (a)  The local legislative body shall immediately issue a proclamation
that:
(i)  gives the total number of votes cast in the local jurisdiction for and
against each law proposed by an initiative petition; and
(ii)  declares those laws proposed by an initiative petition that were
approved by majority vote to be in full force and effect as the law of the
local jurisdiction.
(b)  When the local legislative body determines that two proposed laws, or
that parts of two proposed laws approved by the people at the same election
are entirely in conflict, they shall proclaim that measure to be law that has
received the greatest number of affirmative votes, regardless of the
difference in the majorities which those measures have received.
(c) (i)  Within 10 days after the local legislative body's proclamation, any
qualified voter who signed the initiative petition proposing the law that is
declared by the local legislative body to be superseded by another measure
approved at the same election may apply to the Supreme Court to review the
decision.
(ii)  The court shall:
(A) consider the matter and decide whether or not the proposed laws are in
conflict; and
(B) certify its decision to the local legislative body.
(4)  Within 10 days after the Supreme Court certifies its decision, the local
legislative body shall:
(a)  proclaim all those measures approved by the people as law that the
Supreme Court has determined are not in conflict; and
(b)  of all those measures approved by the people as law that the Supreme
Court has determined to be in conflict, proclaim as law the one that received
the greatest number of affirmative votes, regardless of difference in
majorities.
